Utah statutes.
49-11-603.   Participating employer to report and certify -- Time limit --
Penalties for failure to comply.
(1)  As soon as administratively possible, but in no event later than 60 days
after the end of each pay period, a participating employer shall report and
certify to the office:
(a)  the eligibility for service credit accrual of:
(i)  all current members;
(ii)  each new member as they begin employment; and
(iii)  any changes to eligibility for service credit accrual of each member.
(b)  the compensation of each current member eligible for service credit; and
(c)  other factors relating to the proper administration of this title as
required by the executive director.
(2)  Each participating employer shall submit the reports required under
Subsection (1) in a format approved by the office.
(3)  A participating employer shall be liable to the office for:
(a)  any liabilities and expenses, including administrative expenses and the
cost of increased benefits to members, resulting from the participating
employer's failure to correctly report and certify records under this section;
(b)  a penalty equal to $250 or 50% of the total contributions for the member
for the period of the reporting error, whichever is greater; and
(c)  attorney fees.
(4)  The executive director may waive all or any part of the interest,
penalties, expenses, and fees if the executive director finds there were
extenuating circumstances surrounding the participating employer's failure to
comply with this section.
(5)  The executive director may estimate the length of service, compensation,
or age of any member, if that information is not contained in the records.
